Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.030

Compensation for death or disability.

If any member of the organized militia is injured, incapacitated, or otherwise disabled while in active state service or inactive duty as a member of the organized militia, he or she shall receive from the state of Washington just and reasonable relief in the amount to be determined as provided in this section, including necessary medical care. If the member dies from disease contracted or injury received or is killed while in active state service or inactive duty under order of the governor, then the dependents of the deceased shall receive such compensation as may be allowed as provided in this section. If the United States or any agent thereof, in accordance with any federal statute or regulation, furnishes monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief to militia members or to their dependents for injuries arising out of and occurring in the course of their activities as militia members, but not including Social Security benefits, then the amount of compensation which any militia member or his or her dependents are otherwise entitled to receive from the state of Washington as provided in this section shall be reduced by the amount of monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief the militia member or his or her dependents have received and will receive from the United States or any agent thereof as a result of his or her injury. All claims arising under this section shall be inquired into by a board of three officers, at least one being a medical officer, to be appointed by the adjutant general. The board has the same power to take evidence, administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel witnesses to attend and testify and produce books and papers, and punish their failure to do so as is possessed by a general court martial. The amount of compensation or benefits payable shall conform as nearly as possible to the general schedule of payments and awards provided under the workers' compensation law in effect in the state of Washington at the time the disability or death occurred. The findings of the board shall be reviewed by the adjutant general for final approval. The adjutant general may return the proceedings for revision or for the taking of further testimony. The action of the board when finally approved by the adjutant general is final and conclusive and constitutes the fixed award for the injury or loss and is a debt of the state of Washington.

[ 2019 c 147 s 1; 1989 c 19 s 47; 1987 c 185 s 5; 1984 c 198 s 5; 1943 c 130 s 40; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-40. Prior: 1923 c 49 s 3; 1917 c 107 s 38; 1909 c 134 s 60; 1895 c 108 s 92.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.

Workers' compensation: Title 51 RCW.